Florida, session 2026, HB113.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) Each state university board of trustees,
in exercising its authority delegated by the Board of Governors
of the State University System, shall redesignate the following
roadways or portions of roadways, as applicable:
(a) The University of South Florida board of trustees
shall redesignate USF Alumni Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(b) The University of Central Florida board of trustees
shall redesignate Gemini Boulevard South as Charlie James Kirk
Boulevard.
(c) The Florida State University shall redesignate
Chieftain Way as Charlie James Kirk Road.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb113-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 113 2026
(d) The Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University
shall redesignate West Osceola Street as Charlie James Kirk
Street.
(e) The Florida Atlantic University shall redesignate
University Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(f) The Florida Gulf Coast University shall redesignate
FGCU Boulevard as Charlie James Kirk Boulevard.
(g) The Florida International University shall redesignate
Southwest 17th Street as Charlie James Kirk Street.
(h) The Florida Polytechnic University shall redesignate
Polytechnic Circle as Charlie James Kirk Circle.
(i) New College of Florida shall redesignate College Drive
as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(j) The University of Florida shall redesignate Stadium
Road as Charlie James Kirk Road.
(k) The University of North Florida shall redesignate UNF
Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(l) The University of West Florida shall redesignate
Campus Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(2) Each Florida College System institution board of
trustees, in exercising its authority delegated by the State
Board of Education, shall redesignate the following roadways or
portions of roadways, as applicable:
(a) Broward College shall redesignate College Avenue as
Charlie James Kirk Avenue.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb113-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 113 2026
(b) Chipola College shall redesignate College Street as
Charlie James Kirk Street.
(c) College of Central Florida shall redesignate Southwest
26th Street as Charlie James Kirk Street.
(d) Daytona State College shall redesignate Pinecrest
Avenue as Charlie James Kirk Avenue.
(e) Eastern Florida State College shall redesignate Titan
Boulevard as Charlie James Kirk Boulevard.
(f) Florida Gateway College shall redesignate Southeast
College Place as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(g) The College of the Florida Keys shall redesignate
College Road as Charlie James Kirk Road.
(h) Florida SouthWestern State College shall redesignate
FSW Parkway as Charlie James Kirk Parkway.
(i) Florida State College at Jacksonville shall
redesignate Broad Street as Charlie James Kirk Street.
(j) Gulf Coast State College shall redesignate College
Street as Charlie James Kirk street.
(k) Hillsborough College shall redesignate West Tampa Bay
Boulevard from Air Cargo Road to North Dale Mabry as Charlie
James Kirk Drive.
(l) Indian River State College shall redesignate Cross
Campus Road as Charlie James Kirk Road.
(m) Lake-Sumter State College shall redesignate College
Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb113-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 113 2026
(n) Miami Dade College shall redesignate Northeast 1st
Avenue as Charlie James Kirk Avenue.
(o) North Florida College shall redesignate Mockingbird
Trail as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(p) Northwest Florida State College shall redesignate
McCracken Way as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
(q) Palm Beach State College shall redesignate Ersey
Street as Charlie James Kirk Street.
(r) Pasco-Hernando State College shall redesignate Mrs.
Prameela Musunuru Health And Wellness Trail as Charlie James
Kirk Trail.
(s) Pensacola State College shall redesignate College
Boulevard as Charlie James Kirk Boulevard.
(t) Polk State College shall redesignate PSC Access Road
as Charlie James Kirk Road.
(u) St. Johns River State College shall redesignate Peoria
Cemetery Road as Charlie James Kirk Road.
(v) St. Petersburg College shall redesignate 5th Avenue
North as Charlie James Kirk Avenue.
(w) Sante Fe College shall redesignate Northwest 83rd
Street as Charlie James Kirk Street.
(x) Seminole State College of Florida shall redesignate
College Drive as Charlie James Kirk Street.
(y) South Florida State College shall redesignate College
100 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb113-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 113 2026
101 (z) State College of Florida, Manatee-Sarasota shall
102 redesignate 57th Avenue West as Charlie James Kirk Avenue.
103 (aa) Tallahassee State College shall redesignate Progress
104 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
105 (bb) Valencia College shall redesignate Valencia College
106 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive.
107 (3) State funds shall be withheld from any state
108 university or Florida College System institution whose board of
109 trustees fails to redesignate the roadway or portion of a
110 roadway listed in subsections (1) and (2), respectively, within
111 90 days after the effective date of this act.
112 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb113-00